Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(WWWWW) means for beer permitting purposes any or all of the property that constitutes the facility; provided, however, that the premises must not include the premises of a licensee under § 57-3-202 or any other facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(WWWWW), except as authorized pursuant to § 57-4-101(p). The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated restaurant, resort, and boat dock with fuel having the following characteristics:

Possesses at least twenty (20) acres of U.S. corps of engineers leased water and water frontage on Old Hickory Lake and two thousand feet (2000') of river channel at the southeast corner of the confluence of Old Hickory Lake and State Highway 109;

Has operated for at least sixty (60) straight years on this site;

Possesses at least sixty-five (65) full service paved camp sites;

Possesses boat slips for at least two hundred fifty (250) boats; and

Is located on at least ten (10) acres of real property at that site;

A commercially operated facility that:

Includes an eighteen-hole golf course, a seven-thousand-square-foot clubhouse with a pro shop, banquet room, and restaurant with seating for at least forty (40) patrons;

Contains at least one hundred (100) acres and less than two hundred (200) acres; and

Is located less than one (1) mile from Fort Loudon Lake on Kingston Pike in a county having a population of not less than four hundred thirty-two thousand two hundred (432,200) nor more than four hundred thirty-two thousand three hundred (432,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated independent and assisted living facility possessing the following characteristics:

Is located in a county having a population of not less than nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Has both independent and assisted living facilities available and provides memory care and respite service;

Has several full-service restaurants and dining rooms to service the residents but that are also open to the public and that serve three (3) chef-prepared meals per day;

Has a complete wellness and fitness facility available that accommodates physical and occupational therapy;

Has complete recreational facilities for its residents;

Has not less than one hundred thirty-five (135) individual living unit apartments for residents;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of gender, race, religion, or national origin; and

Has a full-service barber and beauty salon;

A commercially operated facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located on approximately five hundred (500) acres of land;

The facility is located less than three (3) miles north of an area designated as The South Cumberland State Park consisting of approximately thirty thousand (30,000) acres that is open to the public;

The facility is located within five (5) miles of Interstate 24 in a county having a population of not less than thirteen thousand seven hundred (13,700) nor more than thirteen thousand seven hundred fifty (13,750), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The facility includes two (2) cabins, a tiny house, a stage, three (3) fishing ponds, a check-in facility, a bathhouse, fifty (50) RV hookups, multiple hiking trails, frisbee golf, and a wedding pavilion;

The facility serves as a venue for weddings, meetings, and conferences; and

The facility has two (2) event centers that can accommodate at least one hundred fifty (150) guests at each center;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(AAAAAA) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (27)(AAAAAA);

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(AAAAAA) means, for beer permitting purposes, any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) beer permit issued under chapter 5 of this title;

The requirements of § 57-5-105(b)(1) do not apply to any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(AAAAAA); and

Any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(AAAAAA) may seek an additional license as a caterer under this chapter;

A commercially operated facility having the following characteristics:

Contains a restaurant in a free-standing building with retail space and consisting of approximately three thousand square feet (3,000 sq. ft.); and

Is located at the intersection of state highways 46 and 100 in a county having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand six hundred seventy-six (24,676) nor more than twenty-four thousand seven hundred (24,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility having the following characteristics:

Contains a full-service restaurant with seating for at least twenty-nine (29) patrons inside and fourteen (14) patrons outside and that does not use a freezer or a fryer; and

Is located less than one thousand feet (1,000') from a United States Post Office and approximately one mile (1 mi.) from a state natural area featuring a small remnant forest having old growth forest characteristics in a county having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand six hundred seventy-six (24,676) nor more than twenty-four thousand seven hundred (24,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility having the following characteristics:

Contains a full-service restaurant that features live music and that is adjacent to a custom motorcycle shop; and

Is located less than three hundred feet (300') from a United States Post Office and approximately one mile (1 mi.) from a state natural area featuring a small remnant forest having old growth forest characteristics in a county having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand six hundred seventy-six (24,676) nor more than twenty-four thousand seven hundred (24,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Contains a restaurant that has been in operation since at least 2012 with at least forty-two (42) seats inside and seventy-five (75) seats outside;

Contains a banquet hall that is used for weddings, banquets, meetings, and other events and is at least three thousand square feet (3,000 sq. ft.); and

Is located approximately seven hundred (700) yards from state highway 641 South and is adjacent to a winery in a county having a population of not less than thirty-two thousand three hundred one (32,301) nor more than thirty-two thousand four hundred (32,400), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated marina having the following characteristics:

Has open and covered boat slips, a store, a restaurant, and a fuel dock;

Has cabins and RV campsites available for rent; and

Is located on Cordell Hull Lake approximately three thousand feet (3,000') from the confluence of Defeated Creek and the Cumberland River in a county having a population of not less than nineteen thousand one hundred fifty-one (19,151) nor more than nineteen thousand two hundred (19,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated restaurant having the following characteristics:

Has a structure of not less than two thousand square feet (2,000 sq. ft.) that has seating at tables and at the bar for at least ninety-six (96) guests and serves at least one (1) meal a day seven (7) days a week, with the exception of holidays, vacations, and periods of redecorating; and

Is located approximately two thousand five hundred feet (2,500') from two (2) islands in Old Hickory Lake in a county having a population of not less than one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred (113,900) nor more than one hundred fourteen thousand (114,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated marina possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located on Norris Lake in a county having a population of not less than forty thousand seven hundred (40,700) nor more than forty thousand eight hundred (40,800), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Has at least sixty (60) covered boat slips and at least twelve (12) uncovered boat slips;

Has a ship store offering gasoline and other boating supplies and a restaurant with seating for at least eighty (80) patrons, including indoor and outdoor seating; and

Is located approximately one and one-half (1½) miles from a county-owned, public-use airport with a runway four thousand feet (4,000') in length;

A commercially operated facility that:

Has a limestone quarry that sits approximately one thousand seven hundred feet (1,700') southeast of Interstate 65, two thousand seven hundred feet (2,700') south of Interstate 840, and four and six-tenths (4.6) miles north of the junction of US 431 and State Route 247;

Is a venue for live music, weddings, meetings, and other events;

Serves or sells food to patrons;

Has an outdoor amphitheater with a capacity for at least seven thousand (7,000) guests;

Has exclusive or non-exclusive rights to possess or use a commercial kitchen or service kitchen where food is staged and served; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred eighty-three thousand one hundred (183,100) and not more than one hundred eighty-three thousand two hundred (183,200), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) means any and all of the property that constitutes the facility, including all enclosed and outdoor areas of the property. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

Any facility as described in this subdivision (27)(IIIIII), may hold any of the licenses authorized under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) and shall have the privilege of granting a franchise to one (1) or more entities authorizing such an entity to provide food or beverages, including alcoholic beverages and beer, on its premises; provided, that any separate entity must apply to the commission for a separate license, except for an entity already licensed under subdivision (6). For purposes of this subdivision (27)(IIIIII)(iii), the licensee is not required to have exclusive control of a commercial kitchen or any service kitchen, where food is staged and served, as a condition of the license;

Any licensed entity that holds a license under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) may store alcoholic beverages and beer at one (1) or more storage locations in the facility and in any commercial kitchen or service kitchen within the facility; provided, that each licensed entity shall store its inventory of alcoholic beverages and beer in a separately locked cage or other storage area;

Notwithstanding § 57-4-101(p), any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) may serve wine, high gravity beer and beer in its original container, and spirit-based beverages in original containers that do not exceed three hundred seventy-five milliliters (375 ml) and an alcohol content that does not exceed fifteen percent (15%) by volume, or in unlabeled cups or glassware, or in labeled cups or glassware identifying the licensee as the entity selling the alcoholic beverages or beer for on-premise consumption anywhere within the facility. Any franchisee holding a license under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) shall comply with the requirements of § 57-4-101(p); provided, however, that a sticker identifying the licensee, which is reasonably designed to stay affixed to a container, cup, or glassware, must comply with § 57-4-101(p);

The commission shall enforce chapter 4 of this title against each licensee under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) and shall not cite, penalize, or take any other adverse action against a licensee for any violation committed by another licensee on the licensed premises. There is a rebuttable presumption of liability for a specific licensee for any underage sale or other violation based on the unlabeled or labeled container, or unlabeled or labeled cup or glassware, as required pursuant to subdivision (27)(IIIIII)(v), provided to the minor. In the absence of a container, glass, or cup identifying the licensee, the commission has the discretion to determine which licensee to cite for an underage sale or other such violation. If the commission is unable to determine which licensee committed the violation after conducting a reasonable investigation, the commission may issue a citation to one (1) or more licensees that share the premises where the violation occurred;

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility described under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) means, for the purpose of obtaining a beer permit, any and all of the property that constitutes the facility, including all enclosed and outdoor areas of the property. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. The beer board shall enforce chapter 5 of this title against each licensee as a beer permittee and shall not cite, penalize, or take any other adverse action against a licensee for any violation committed by another licensee on the licensed premises. There is a rebuttable presumption of liability for a specific licensee for any underage sale or other violation based on the unlabeled or labeled container, or unlabeled or labeled cup or glassware, as required pursuant to subdivision (27)(IIIIII)(v), provided to the minor. In the absence of a container, glass, or cup identifying the licensee, the local beer board has the discretion to determine which licensee to cite for an underage sale or other such violation. If the beer board is unable to determine which licensee committed the violation after conducting a reasonable investigation, the beer board may issue a citation to one (1) or more licensees that share the premises where the violation occurred;

Notwithstanding § 57-4-203(e)(1), any licensee licensed under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) may sell and distribute wine in any unsealed container for consumption on the licensed premises;

Any licensee licensed under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) may seek an additional license as a caterer under chapter 4 of this title, and is not required to comply with the requirements of § 57-4-102(6)(A) or show exclusive control of a commercial kitchen or any service kitchen, where food is staged and served, as a condition of the license. Caterers licensed under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII)(ix) may store alcoholic beverages and beer in any shared commercial kitchen or service kitchen. The inventory of alcoholic beverages and beer must be stored in a separately locked cage or other storage area;

Nothing in this subdivision (27)(IIIIII) may be construed to prevent a facility, as described under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII), from designating any area of its premises for purposes authorized under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII), or for the purposes of an entity licensed under this title; provided, that premises designated for use by another entity under this title are no longer part of the premises of any license issued under this subdivision (27)(IIIIII), except as provided in § 57-4-101(p); and

The facility, landlord, tenant, or any licensee located in the facility shall provide periodic security for the entire licensed premises;

A commercially operated recreational facility having all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located approximately one mile (1 mi.) from the confluence of Clear Creek and the Obed River and is centrally located in one of this state's rock climbing meccas;

The facility is located on approximately forty (40) acres;

The facility provides at least forty (40) campsites and contains a restaurant and a brewery; and

The facility is located in a county having a population of not less than twenty-one thousand nine hundred (21,900) nor more than twenty-two thousand (22,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(JJJJJJ) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Has an outdoor waterpark site covering at least fifty (50) acres that has a wave pool and other water attractions that contain at least one million seven hundred thousand {1,700,000) gallons of water; and

Is located approximately five hundred feet (500') south of a municipal convention center, approximately two thousand two hundred feet (2,200') west of a state highway named in honor of a former governor of this state, and in a county having a population of not less than eighty-nine thousand eight hundred (89,800) nor more than eighty-nine thousand nine hundred (89,900), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility that:

(a) Serves as an event venue for weddings, a farmer's market, photography, birthdays, festivals, and similar events;

(i) (a) Serves as an event venue for weddings, a farmer's market, photography, birthdays, festivals, and similar events;

Contains a small and large dog park with obstacle courses and a dog wash station;

Contains a tree grove;

Operates a facility that is greater than seventeen thousand square feet (17,000 sq. ft.) containing a dual convention space that can accommodate up to five hundred (500) people, and a restaurant with indoor and outdoor seating for approximately two hundred (200) guests;

Offers scenic mountain overlook views; and

Is located in a municipality with a population of not less than nine thousand eight hundred forty (9,840) and not more than nine thousand eight hundred forty-nine (9,849);

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(LLLLLL) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing. The designated premises may only include property owned or leased by the facility and that is contiguous to the property of the facility that is defined in this subdivision (27)(LLLLLL). The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) license issued under this subdivision (27)(LLLLLL); and

Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 5 of this title to the contrary, the premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(LLLLLL) means, for beer permitting purposes, any or all of the property that constitutes the facility. The beer permittee shall designate the premises to be permitted by the local beer board by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the beer permittee filing a new drawing. The entire designated premises is covered under one (1) beer permit issued under chapter 5 of this title;

A commercially operated facility that:

Is an event and wedding venue located on fifty-three (53) acres containing:

A space under roof of over thirteen thousand square feet (13,000 sq. ft.) equipped with heat and air conditioning year-round;

Six thousand five hundred square feet (6,500 sq. ft.) of paver patio;

Sixteen thousand square feet (16,000 sq. ft.) of barefoot cozy turf;

A covered patio of one thousand seven hundred eighty-seven square feet (1,787 sq. ft.) adjacent to the main hall; and

A one-thousand-eight-hundred-square-foot bridal suite, and a groom's lounge with a wet bar, foosball table, and a large television;

Contains an equestrian center that is seven thousand square feet (7,000 sq. ft.);

Contains a prep kitchen with two (2) stoves, two (2) ovens, a warming box, high-capacity ice maker, sinks, work stations, and drive-up load area;

Operates working equine facilities of six thousand five hundred square feet (6,500 sq. ft.), including an arena, and a workshop barn that is two thousand square feet (2,000 sq. ft.); and

Is located in a county with a population of not less than one hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred (113,900) and not more than one hundred fourteen thousand (114,000), according to the 2010 or any subsequent federal census;

includes the area encompassed by the boundaries of the historic district; provided, that the granting of a license for a business location within such historical district shall not preclude the granting of another license to another establishment located within the boundaries of the historic district. This subdivision (28) applies only to counties with a population of more than four hundred thousand (400,000), according to the 1980 census, but those counties having a metropolitan form of government shall be exempt from this subdivision (28). In such county, only for the purposes of the hours of sale provided in §57-4-203(d)(4), “premises” also includes any establishment located within four (4) blocks west of the western boundary of the historic district and on the same public street or right of way as the historic district; provided, that the requirement of closing the street or right-of-way to motor vehicular traffic on a regular basis shall not apply to the extension of the premises established by this sentence. Within the premises as defined in this subdivision (28)(A), and subject to the municipality's right of ownership and control and any conditions, rules, or regulations imposed by the city or its designee or by law, alcoholic beverages may also be served to customers seated at tables and chairs contiguous to the outside front wall of a licensee's building;

includes only the area located between a convention center, its designated convention center hotel, and a museum that is attached to the convention center hotel; and the one (1) block of public roadway on Fifth Avenue between Demonbreun Street and Korean Veterans Boulevard; and

“Premises,” when:

Referring to an establishment licensed under this chapter;

Such establishment is located within a central improvement district; and

The central improvement district is located in a county having a metropolitan government that has a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

This subdivision (28)(B) shall only be effective in any county upon the adoption of a resolution by a majority vote of the local legislative body approving the use of this definition of “premises”;

“Premises,” when:

Referring to one (1) or more establishments licensed under this chapter, or a manufacturer exercising the rights granted to it under § 57-3-202(i)(1); and

Such establishments are located:

Within a home rule municipality in a county with a population of not less than three hundred thirty-six thousand four hundred (336,400) and not more than three hundred thirty-six thousand five hundred (336,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Within or adjacent to an area that is a five hundred seventy-five foot (575') paver lined street with a right of way that is approximately forty feet (40') wide extending from Market Street on the western boundary to Rossville Avenue on the eastern boundary; that is bordered along its northern boundary by a historic railroad terminal station that has been listed on the National Register of Historic Places since 1974; and that is bordered along its northern boundary by property zoned for urban-industrial mixed use and along its southern boundary by property that is zoned for urban-commercial mixed use;

includes the area described in subdivision (28)(C)(ii)(b ). The granting of a license for a business located within or adjacent to the boundaries of the area described in subdivision (28)(C)(ii)(b ) does not preclude the granting of another license to another establishment located within or adjacent to such area;

The exhibits containing live aquatic animals for public viewing are housed in a building having at least one hundred thousand square feet (100,000 sq. ft.) of interior space;

The exhibits containing live aquatic animals for public viewing contain a minimum total of five hundred thousand gallons (500,000 gals.) of water as the living environment of the animals; and

The public aquarium is located in a county having a population in excess of two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

(A) “Restaurant” means any public place kept, used, maintained, advertised and held out to the public as a place where meals are served and where meals are actually and regularly served, without sleeping accommodations, such place being provided with adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and seating capacity of at least forty (40) people at tables, having employed therein a sufficient number and kind of employees to prepare, cook and serve suitable food for its guests. An establishment shall be eligible for licensure as a restaurant in accordance with this part, if the establishment is open at least three (3) days a week, with the exception of holidays, vacations, periods of redecorating and seasonal closings, and more than fifty percent (50%) of the gross revenue of the restaurant is generated from the serving of meals. As used in this subdivision (30), “seasonal closing” means the period from November 1 to March 1 or a period of time, if different from such dates, as filed by the restaurant with the alcoholic beverage commission;

“Restaurant” also means any bowling center that was licensed as of January 1, 1983, to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises;

In counties with a population of more than three hundred nineteen thousand six hundred twenty-five (319,625), according to the 1980 census, but excluding those counties having a metropolitan form of government:

Within a national historic landmark district or urban park center, as defined by this section, or within an easement area granted to a municipality for commercial recreation and commercial recreation facilities from the Tennessee Valley authority in the Fort Loudoun Reservoir:

Restaurant licensees shall not be required to meet any requirements of this section which make food service, maintenance of a kitchen, or a dining room a prerequisite to the issuance of a restaurant permit to serve liquor by the drink; and

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, restaurant licensees may enter into leases with municipal landowners in which gross sales, which may include or exclude liquor sales, are considered in the determination of a percentage rent or other rent calculation provision; and

Within a sports authority facility, as defined in this section, restaurant licensees shall not be required to meet any of the requirements of subdivision (30)(A) which make food service, maintenance of a kitchen, or a dining room a prerequisite for the issuance of a permit to serve liquor by the drink;

Notwithstanding the minimum seating capacity established in subdivision (30)(A), for the purpose of a permit to serve wine, “restaurant” means any lodge or resort with sleeping accommodations where meals are served that is located on land which is owned by the United States department of the interior, is operated by the national park service or its agents or contractors and is located in a county with a population of not less than forty-one thousand four hundred (41,400) nor more than forty-one thousand five hundred (41,500), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Restaurant” also means a facility located in any municipality having a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census, or any subsequent federal census, in which coffees, teas, pastries, and other foodstuffs are offered for sale for consumption on the premises, which facility has a seating capacity of at least thirty (30) seats and which facility obtains at least fifty percent (50%) of its annual gross sales from the sale of coffees, teas and pastries. Any restaurant licensed under this subdivision (30)(E) shall be authorized to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises only when such beverages are mixed with coffees, teas and other beverages. A restaurant licensed under this subdivision (30)(E) need not meet the requirement of subdivision (30)(A);

“Restaurant” also means a facility:

Located within one-half (½) mile of the railroad tracks in the unincorporated area of any county having a population of not less than thirty thousand two hundred (30,200) nor more than thirty thousand four hundred seventy-five (30,475), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Whose primary source of income is from serving meals to its patrons, both indoors and out-of-doors, and has a total seating capacity of at least seventy-five (75) people at tables;

Located in a building having a total square footage of at least two thousand five hundred square feet (2,500 sq. ft.) which was constructed prior to 1925; and

Which is located on a site used during the Civil War or within two (2) miles of two (2) or more Civil War sites, or is within one and one-half (1 ½) miles of a home that was built in 1884, and which is preserved as the area's best example of the Queen Anne and Eastlake architectural styles;

“Restaurant” also means a facility:

Located on Highway 243 in a county having a population of not less than sixty-nine thousand four hundred (69,400) nor more than sixty-nine thousand five hundred (69,500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

That has seating for not more than one hundred forty (140) people;

That has a music and entertainment orientation;

Whose primary source of income is derived from serving meals to its patrons;

That has a historic working original malt and soda fountain;

That is located in a historical structure formerly used as a town hall as well as a practice venue for Grand Ole Opry hopefuls; and

That does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or origin;

Restaurant also means a facility that:

Is owned, operated or leased by a for-profit organization organized under the laws of this state;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin;

Provides food service to the public or for private events and catering with seating capacity for at least two hundred fifty (250) persons at tables, whether or not the seating is inside or on a deck or patio;

Is open at least five (5) days a week serving two (2) meals daily with the exception of holidays, vacations, seasonal conditions and periods of redecorating, with suitable kitchen, dining facilities and equipment;

Is in the center of a full service marina and resort located on the Tennessee River at mile marker 477.5; which full service marina has at least six hundred (600) dry storage slips and wet slips up to eighty feet (80') that offers two (2) cabins completely furnished and an inn with twelve (12) rooms that overlooks the Tennessee River; and

Is located in any county having a population of not less than three hundred seven thousand eight hundred (307,800) nor more than three hundred seven thousand nine hundred (307,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A restaurant under this subdivision (30)(H) must comply with all the requirements of this chapter and shall be subject to the restrictions imposed upon licenses other than § 57-4-103;

“Restaurant” also means a facility:

Located on State Route 46, Old Hillsboro Road, in any county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-six thousand six hundred (126,600) nor more than one hundred twenty-six thousand seven hundred (126,700), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Which is located 1.66 miles from the Natchez Trace Parkway Exit off of Pinewood Road;

Whose primary source of income is from serving meals to its patrons;

Which first opened as a restaurant in 1968;

Which does not operate as a grocery store; and

Which does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

“Restaurant” also means a facility that:

Is located in a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Is a twenty-four-hour-a-day diner;

Is located in a central business improvement district as of 2017;

Serves full meals and has a full-time kitchen staff, twenty-four (24) hours a day;

Holds a valid license from the commission;

Is located in a separate, unattached building;

Does not permit live music or entertainment, nor share walls with any establishment offering live music or entertainment; and

Has six (6) floors and at least seventeen thousand square feet (17,000 sq. ft.); and

“Restaurant” also means a facility that:

Is located in a county with a metropolitan form of government having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Is situated to the east and to the west of the Cumberland River in Pennington Bend;

Is located approximately two thousand feet (2,000') to the northwest of a resort and convention center;

Is a venue for live music;

Has an outdoor deck that is approximately three thousand square feet (3,000 sq. ft.); and

Operates a restaurant that is approximately eight thousand square feet (8,000 sq. ft.) with a seating capacity of approximately two hundred fifty (250);

“Restaurant” also means a facility that:

Began operating on September 5, 2018;

Has a seating capacity for patrons of approximately one hundred forty (140);

Is located on Hixson Pike within one thousand five hundred feet (1,500') of Dallas Bay on the Tennessee River and within six thousand feet (6,000') of Chester Frost Park;

Is approximately two thousand square feet (2,000 sq. ft.); and

Is located in a county with a population of not less than three hundred thirty-six thousand four hundred (336,400) and not more than three hundred thirty-six thousand five hundred (336,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The center does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin;

“Retirement center” also means a facility that contains each of the following characteristics:

The center is located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred fifty-six thousand eight hundred (156,800) nor more than one hundred fifty-six thousand nine hundred (156,900), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

The center will consist of recreational areas, a fitness center, a dining room with seating for at least one hundred fifty (150) people and a lounge area, and at least one hundred (100) individual living unit apartments;

The center will have a facility of at least one hundred five thousand square feet (105,000 sq. ft.) and is located on approximately eight (8) acres near the corner of Fort Henry Drive and Holston Hills Drive; and

The center's lounge area will offer, to the center's residents and their guests only, food, nonalcoholic beverages, mixed alcoholic drinks, wine, and beer, as well as make available in the dining room and other areas within the center's property, for the center's residents and guests only, mixed alcoholic drinks, wine, and beer;

Was organized pursuant to a municipal urban planning and development board;

Contains within such special historic district an historic district listed on the national register of historic places;

Is located on a trolley line; and

Is located in any county having a population of eight hundred thousand (800,000) or more, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

(A) “Special occasion license” means a license which the commission may issue to a bona fide charitable, nonprofit or political organization. Such license shall be issued for no longer than one (1) twenty-four-hour period, subject to the limitations of hours of sale which may be imposed by law or regulation, and such license may be issued in advance of its effective date;

If a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization owns and maintains a permanently staffed facility which:

Is used for the periodic showing or exhibition of animals;

Has a seating capacity of not less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) persons; and

Has a separate permanently constructed clubhouse or meeting room located on the grounds,

then a special occasion license may be issued for use at the clubhouse or meeting room for the duration of the particular show or exhibit for which application is made, and such organization shall not be subject to the numeric limitation contained in the last sentence of this subdivision (33). This license shall only be available upon the payment of the fee as required by law for each separate day of the show;

Such license shall not be issued unless and until there shall have been paid to the commission for each such license a license fee of one hundred dollars ($100), and there shall have been submitted an application which designates the premises upon which alcoholic beverages shall be served. No such charitable, nonprofit or political organization shall be eligible to receive more than twelve (12) special occasion licenses in any calendar year;

A special occasion license under this section may also be issued to a nonprofit historical society for the purpose of serving complimentary samples of homemade wine manufactured in the Swiss tradition by a society member or members, the complimentary samples not to exceed one ounce (1 oz.) per wine type per person to be served at an annual festival conducted by a society celebrating the Swiss heritage at a farm museum in any county having a population of not less than fourteen thousand three hundred (14,300) nor more than fourteen thousand four hundred (14,400), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;
